Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.115

Gifts, grants, bequests, or contributions.

The director of the department may accept, expend, and retain gifts, grants, bequests, or contributions from public or private sources to carry out the purposes and programs of the department.

[ 2011 c 245 s 1.]